src/morphology/phonology.twolc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no



!! !!!Alphabet 

Alphabet   

!! !!The Inari Saami letters

 a á â ä b c d e f g h i j k l m n o õ p q !!= * @CODE@
 r s t u v w x y z æ ä ø ö å			   !!=  @CODE@
 č đ ŋ ŧ š ž				 			   !!=  @CODE@

 A Á Â Å B C D E F G H I J K L M N O Õ P Q !!= * @CODE@
 R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ä Ø Ö Å 			   !!=  @CODE@
 Č Đ Ŋ Ŧ Š Ž  							   !!=  @CODE@
   %- 							   !!= * @CODE@
 '   !!= * @CODE@ the hyphen as hyphen
  ⎈     !!= * @CODE@ the ghost sign used in compounding, does not work in hfst

!! !Accented letters, just in case

 É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ð   !!= * @CODE@
 é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý þ ð   !!=  @CODE@
 ß ª ß ç								   !!=  @CODE@

 
 
!! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     !! * »
 «7     !!  «
 %[%>%] !!  >
 %[%<%] !!  <



!! !Different archiphonemes


p4:p  k4:k  l4:l t4:t č4:č c4:c   !!= * @CODE@  these are consonants that change in cg
i4:i                    	        !!= * @CODE@  this is the underlying i consonant
i2:i u2:u â2:â        	        !!= * @CODE@  this is final i, u in contract verbs etc changing to e, o
i3:i           	        !!= * @CODE@  this is invariant i
a5:a á5:á e5:e i5:i u5:u y5:y o5:o  ä5:ä               !!= * @CODE@  these do not change 
c5:c č5:č d5:d h5:h j5:j l5:l m5:m ŋ5:ŋ r5:r t5:t z5:z  !!= * @CODE@  these do not change
b6:b d6:d g6:g !!= * @CODE@ clitic consonants, jiemge, epke
j6:0 !!= * @CODE@ a fake consonant, to get WG rules to function, e.g. puávui
i6:0 !!= * @CODE@ a fake vowel, to get WG rules to function, e.g. kyehtlov (kyehti6lov)
 ':' !!= * @CODE@ is the real apostroph

!! !More abstract archiphonemes

!%^A:0		 = algan lodán
%^RC:0		!!= * @CODE@ = root cons., lengthened by ^CLEN - máán%RCu máánnun
%^RV:0	 	!!= * @CODE@ = root vowel, lengthened by ^RLEN - ta%^RVvlu taavlu 
%^SC:0      !!= * @CODE@ = stem cons, %^SC:j, pluss lengthen after earlier shortening by %^CSH, see lyeme
%^SV:0 		!!= * @CODE@ = stem vowel, lengthened by ^SLEN u:uu - táálu%^SV tááloost
%^VO:0			!!= * @CODE@ = vowel copy

!! !Triggers

%^CLEN:0	!!= * @CODE@ = Cons lengthening, with ^RC
%^CSH:0     !!= * @CODE@ = Cons shortening, laaŋkku - laaŋkun
%^RVSH:0    !!= * @CODE@ = Root vowel shortening
%^FCD:0     !!= * @CODE@ = Final consonant deletion 
%^FVD:0     !!= * @CODE@ = Final vowel deletion 
%^EA:0      !!= * @CODE@ = Stem vowel: e and i to a/á in ill, and root vowel ä>á, e(e)>iä, ie>iä, ye>uá
%^EX:0      !!= * @CODE@ = Stem vowel: i to â where it should have been á, this is Err/Orth only
%^RLEN:0    !!= * @CODE@ = Root vowel lengthening
%^SLEN:0    !!= * @CODE@ = Stem vowel lengthening
%^SVLOW:0   !!= * @CODE@ = Stem vowel lowering â>á and u>o - árppu árppoin, Root vowel shortening when more than one cns in consonant centre and suffix starts with i
%^SVSH:0    !!= * @CODE@ = Stem vowel shortening kappeer kaperân
%^WG:0      !!= * @CODE@ = Weak grade trigger
%^ÁE:0      !!= * @CODE@ = á to e in 3-syll, triggered by ^WG
%^ÁI:0      !!= * @CODE@ = á to i in 3-syll, triggered by ^WG
%^VHIGH:0   !!= * @CODE@ = High rootvow for verbs: e>iä, a>o, o>u, ää>áá, ee>iä, note also: ie>iä, ye>uá, uo>uá
%^VBACK:0   !!= * @CODE@ = Back rootvow for verbs: ä(ä)>a(a), á>aa, uá>o, ye>uo
%^BLOCK:0   !!= * @CODE@ = This symbol just to block otherwise triggering contexts
%^IUML:0   !!= * @CODE@ = â to e in front of high suffixes 

!! Trigger ordering in twolc and lexc, from left to right:

!! {{{
!! SV|ÁE|ÁI  EA|EX|SC  FCD|FVD  WG|CSH  CLEN  VHIGH|VBACK  RVSH|RLEN  SLEN|SVSH  SVLOW
!! }}}


!! !!Morpheme boundaries:

!! Here we define the suffix border >
!! The other borders are not used yet, but still defined:

 «  !!≈ ;@CODE@: Derivational prefix
 »  !!≈ ;@CODE@: Derivational suffix
 %< !!≈ ;@CODE@: Inflectional prefx
 %> !!≈ ;@CODE@: Inflectional suffix
 %^ !!≈ ;@CODE@: (exceptional) soft hyphenation point
 #  !! and the symbol #, which is Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds

!! End of alphabet definitions

;

!! !!! Sets

Sets 
 Vow = a á â ä e i o u u2 y æ ø ö å            !!= * @CODE@ 
       i2 u2 â2                                !!= @CODE@ 
       i3                                      !!= @CODE@ 
       a5 á5 i5 u5 y5 o5 ä5 		           !!= @CODE@ 
       i6                                      !!= @CODE@ 
       é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý 	   !!= @CODE@ 
       A Á Â Ä E I O U Y Æ Ø Ö Å			   !!= @CODE@ 
       É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ú Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý 	   !!= @CODE@ 
       %^RV %^SV ;						       !!= @CODE@ 
 RealVow = a á â ä e i o u y æ ø ö å y5	i2 i5 i3 i6	â2   !!= * @CODE@ 
       é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý 	   !!= @CODE@ 
       A Á Â Ä E I O U Y Æ Ø Ö Å 		   !!= @CODE@ 
       É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ú Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý ;   !!= @CODE@ 
 Cns = b c č d đ f g h j k l m n ŋ 			   !!= * @CODE@ 
       p q r s š t ŧ v w x z ž				   !!= @CODE@ 
       B C Č D Đ F G H J K L M N Ŋ			   !!= @CODE@ 
       P Q R S Š T Ŧ V W X Z Ž 				   !!= @CODE@ 
        g2 k2 m2 n2 							   !!= @CODE@ 
       b3 d3 g3 m3 h3 						   !!= @CODE@ 
       p4 k4 r4 l4  i4  t4 c4 č4                !!= @CODE@
       h5 j5 ŋ5 t5 c5 l5 t5 d5 r5 z5 j6                   !!=  @CODE@
       %^RC %^SC   ;                         !!= @CODE@
 UnvoicedCns = c č f h k p s š t  ;             !!= * @CODE@
 Geminate = b d g p h t k c f z l m n ŋ r s š v  ;  !!= * @CODE@  
 Sgm = Vow Cns ;							   !!= * @CODE@ 
 NotSuffixBorder = Vow %^FCD %FVD Cns %^CSH %^WG %^CLEN %^SLEN %^RLEN %^SVLOW %^RVSH %^ÁE %^ÁI %^EA %^EX %^SVSH ; !!= * @CODE@ 
 Triggers =   %^FCD %^FVD %^WG %^CSH %^CLEN %^SLEN %^RLEN %^RVSH %^SVLOW %^ÁE %^EA %^EX %^ÁI %^SVSH %^VHIGH %^VBACK %^IUML ; !!= * @CODE@ 
 TriggersnotFCVD = %^WG %^CSH %^CLEN %^SLEN %^RLEN %^RVSH %^SVLOW %^ÁE %^EA %^EX %^ÁI %^SVSH %^VHIGH %^VBACK %^IUML ; !!= * @CODE@
 StemCns = b b3 d d3 g g2 g3 h h2 h3 		   !!= * @CODE@ 
           j l m m2 m3 m8 n n8 n2 ŋ r s  ;     !!= @CODE@ 



           
!! !!!Definition section

!! Introducing a WG right context 
!! {{{WeakGrade =  (RealVow:) [:RealVow |i6:]  (Cns:) ([%^SV:|%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) (%^FCD:) %^WG:0   ; }}}  

Definitions

WeakGrade =  (RealVow:) [:RealVow - č: |i6:] (Vow:) (Cns:+) ([%^SV:|%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) (%^EA:)([%^FCD:|%^FVD:]) %^WG:0      ;   
ConsonantShorting =  (RealVow:) [:RealVow - č: |i6:] (Vow:) (Cns:+) ([%^SV:|%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) ([%^EA:|%^EX:]) ([%^FCD:|%^FVD:]) %^CSH:0 ;  
Syll = :* Cns:+ Vow: :* ; 

!! As we look at more cases, the WeakGrade definition tends to be longer. 
!! We want to keep it short, but we want the code to work Thus, we document.
!! * The second :RealVow is there for long consonant stems
!! * The (Cns:) is there for consonant stems

!! !!!Rule section

Rules

!! !!Consonant rules

!! !Consonant gradation



"x:y consonant gradation"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  WG gives x:x and x:y, when there is no consonant lengthening  
Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _ (%^RC: )  WeakGrade  ([%^VHIGH:|%^VBACK:]) ([%^RVSH:|%^RLEN:]) (%^SLEN:) (%^SVLOW:)  [.#.| %>] ; !RULE RC only \CLEN makes conflict
	where Cx in ( h p c č )    
          Cy in ( v v s j )    
		  matched ;

!!€ va^RVh%^RCo^WG^CLEN>im
!!€ va0vvo00>im


"Quality change of root consonant x:yy"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  consonant lengthening after WG, changing h:v, p:v, c:s
Cx:Cy <=> Vow:  _ %^RC: :Vow+ Cns:* [Triggers: -  %^FCD:]* %^WG: %^CLEN: (%^VHIGH:|%^VBACK:) (%^RVSH:) ([%^SVLOW: |%^SLEN:]) %> [ i:|s|u|o|ž|e h | e m | á] ; !RULE RC
	where Cx in ( h p c )
	      Cy in ( v v s ) 
		  matched ;



"t:đ, also tk4:đh gradation, part 1" 
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\   
t:đ <=> Vow: _   k4: (%^RC:) WeakGrade ; !RULE RC !! 1) tk4:đk WG 
!        Vow: _   t4: WeakGrade %^CLEN: ; !RULE RC !! 2) tt4:đđ 
        Vow: _ (%^RC:)  WeakGrade  ; !RULE RC !! 2) čyet%^RCi3:čyeđi
        Vow: _ j  WeakGrade  ; !RULE RC !! 3) vitjá:viđjá

!!€ jo^RVtk4â^WG^RLEN>
!!€ joođhâ00>


"k4:h gradation for kk4, tk4, rkk4, lkk4"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  
k4:h <=> Vow: [t:|k:]                    _  WeakGrade  ; !RULE RC  !! 1) WG atka:ađha, kk4:h
         Vow: [l | r | v | i4: | đ | j ]  k: _  WeakGrade ; !RULE RC !! 2) e.g. rkk:rh

"xx:yy gradation for xx4"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\   puáhhoin, sukk4á:suhháást
Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _  Cz:Cy WeakGrade %^CLEN: ; !RULE RC 
	where Cx in ( k  c  p ) 
	      Cy in ( h  s  v ) 
	      Cz in ( k4 c4 p4  ) 
		  matched ;
         
!!€ mä^RVtk4i^WG^RLEN>.#.
!!€ määđhi00>.#.

!!€ su^RVkk4á^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ su0hháá000>st


"h:v gradation for hh"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  já%^RVhhá%^SVl%^ÁI : jäävvil
h:v <=> Vow:     _ h: WeakGrade  %^CLEN: ; !RULE RC  !! 1) WG hh:vh
        Vow:  h: _    WeakGrade  ; !RULE RC  !! 2) WG hh:hv
!kahhaan:kahanân
!!€ kahhaan^CSH^SVSH>ân
!!€ ka0h0an00>ân



"x4:z gradation for xx4" 
!! * __@RULENAME@__ 
Cy:Cz <=> Cx: _  WeakGrade ; !RULE RC !! čuottâlm:čuođâlm njuottâs 
       where Cx in ( t  c  č  p   ) 
             Cy in ( t4 c4 č4 p4  ) 
             Cz in ( đ  s  j   v  ) 
       matched ;

!!€ ru^RVtt4â^WG^RLEN>
!!€ ruu0đâ00>
 
!rejected:       
!!€ haavvâr^CSH^SVSH>ist
!!€ ha00vâr00>ist

!rejected:       
!!€ pottáák^SC^CSH^SVSH>ist
!!€ po0t0ákk00>ist


"xy:zy gradation"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  ht:vt, we use h 
Cx:v <=>  _  Cz (%^RC:) Vow:+ (%^SV: ) (Cns:+) ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) (%^EA:)  ([%^FCD:|%^FVD:]) %^WG: ; !RULE RC !! 1) pi%^RVhtâs
          _  Cz t Vow ([%^FCD:|%^FVD:]) %^WG: ;  !RULE RC !! 2) tekstâ
       where Cx in ( h k4 k4 h h ) 
             Cz in ( t s  š č c ) 
       matched ;


!!€ pihtâs^WG
!!€ pivtâs0

!!€ totk4os^WG
!!€ tođhos0



!!€ á^RVrppu^WG^RLEN>
!!€ áár0pu00>

!!€ á^RVrppu^WG^RVSH>ttáá
!!€ á0r0pu00>ttáá

!!€ riänttus^WG>
!!€ riän0tus0>

!kurrâ kuurân
!!€ ku^RVrrâ^CSH^RLEN>n
!!€ kuu0râ00>n

!sollâ sooân
!!€ so^RVllâ^CSH^RLEN>n
!!€ soo0lâ00>n


!! !Consonant shortening

"k:0 gradation for xkk4"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\  for lkk4, rkk4, vkk4
k:0 <=> Vow: [l | j | r | v | i4: | đ ] _ k4:h  WeakGrade (%^CLEN: ) (%^VBACK:) (%^SVLOW:) ; !RULE RC !! 1) WG 
        Vow: [l | j | r | v | i4: | đ ] _ k4:k Vow: ([%^EA:|%^EX:]) %^CSH: (%^VBACK:) (%^RLEN:)  [.#.| %>] ; !RULE RC !! 2) CSH 



"xyy:xy gradation A"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\   há%^RVi4ttás%^ÁI
Cy:0 <=> :Vow (Vow:) Cx: _ Cz: (%^RC:) WeakGrade \%^CLEN:   ;   !RULE RC !! 1) WG
                     Cx: _ Cz:  ConsonantShorting    ; !RULE RC   !! 2) CSH  !he%^RVi4ttug
                     Cx: _ Cz:  i: %^FVD: %^CSH:    ; !RULE RC   !! 3) 
      where Cx in ( j i4 i4 j j i4 i4 i4 i4 l l l l l l l m m m n n n ŋ r r r r r r r r v v v v v ) 
            Cy in ( p c  s  s t k  l  p  t  c k p s t č š p č s c s t k c č p k s t č š c d k p t ) 
            Cz in ( p c  s  s t k  l  p  t  c k p s t č š p č s c s t k c č p k s t č š c d k p t ) 
      matched ;


"č:0 in čč4 consonant gradation when CLEN"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ when čč4
č:0 <=> Vow: _ č4:  WeakGrade %^CLEN: ; !RULE RC

!iṣ̌e:iše
!!€ i^RVš^RCe^WG>
!!€ i0š0e0>


!luččâ:luujáin 
!!€ lu^RVčč4â^WG^RLEN^SVLOW>in
!!€ luu0já000>in


"From i4j to j when WG and CSH"
!! * __@RULENAME@__ \\ e.g. sai4joos:sajoos
i4:0 <=> Vow: _ j:  WeakGrade ; !RULE RC !! 1) when WG
         Vow: _ j:  ConsonantShorting ; !RULE RC !! 2) when CSH 
         Vow _ n j (%^CLEN:) (%^RLEN:) %^SVSH: [%>|.#.] ;  !RULE SV !! 3)  -i- in piehâin to piehânân piehâin piäi4ppái4n
         
